Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB236.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5903(j) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 5903. Obscene and other sexual materials and performances.* * *(j) Exemptions.--Nothing in this section shall apply to any recognized historical society or museum accorded charitable status by the Federal Government, any county, city, borough, township or town library, any public library, any library of any [school,] college or university or any archive or library under the supervision and control of the Commonwealth or a [political subdivision] municipality.* * *123456789101112131415161718 Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0236PN0189 - 2 - 1